Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Part 2 White Pine Blister Rust

2-17-9.
Nuisance.

The white pine blister rust, a disease of five (5) needle pines and the species of the genus ribes, is declared to be a public nuisance, and its suppression is authorized and required. No owner or occupant of an estate infested with that nuisance is by
reason of that infestation liable to an action, civil or criminal, except to the extent and in the manner and form set forth in this part 2.

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-9

.

2-17-10.
Powers of director.

The department of environmental management shall take steps to suppress the nuisance described in §

2-17-9

and to this end the director of that department may make all necessary rules and regulations governing all work done under the provisions of §§

2-17-9

—

2-17-16

. The director may act in cooperation with any person or persons, corporation or corporations, including other states, or the United States, may make any rules governing the suppression or extermination of the disease,
including the destruction of diseased or exposed species of five (5) leaved pines and the diseased or exposed species of the genus ribes, that he or she may deem necessary, may at all times enter upon the land of the state or of a
municipality, corporation, or other owner or owners, and may use all reasonable means in carrying out the purposes of §§ 2-17-9 —

2-17-16

and in those undertakings, may, in accordance with the provisions of those sections, expend the funds appropriated for these purposes.

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-10

.

2-17-11.
Rules as to transportation and planting.

The director of environmental management shall make any rules and regulations that he or she may deem expedient in combatting the disease with reference to the transportation of five (5) leaved pine trees and species of the genus ribes, or wood, lumber
or other material derived from those trees, or shrubs, or in regard to the planting of those trees or shrubs.

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-11

.

2-17-12.
Destruction of uninfected plants.

If, in the opinion of the director of environmental management or his or her appointed agents, it becomes necessary to destroy five (5) leaved pines or species of the genus ribes not actually infected with the disease, the owner may receive compensation
for any species of the genus ribes it becomes necessary to destroy, if he or she makes demand within twenty-four (24) hours after notification from the department of the intention to destroy the species. In case any owner makes demand
for compensation for the property it becomes necessary to destroy, application shall be made to the director to appoint some qualified disinterested person to appraise the value of the species of the genus ribes that it becomes necessary
to destroy, and the destruction of the property shall be deferred pending the appraisal of the value of the property. The appraiser shall, upon appraising the value of property that it becomes necessary to destroy, certify the facts
of the appraisal to the department of environmental management and the amount of the appraised value of the property shall be paid to the owner of the property, and the destruction of the property shall proceed.

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-12

.

2-17-13.
Local appropriations.

Any town or city may make any appropriation it deems necessary towards the suppression of the nuisance within its limits, and may appoint an official with any powers and limitation it shall prescribe, to expend its appropriations in cooperation with the
department of environmental management.

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-13

.

2-17-14.
Unlawful importation or transportation.

Any person importing into this state, or transporting from place to place within this state, contrary to the rules or regulations of the director of environmental management, any five (5) leaved pines or species of the genus ribes, shall be fined not
to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-14

.

2-17-15.
Obstruction — Violations.

Any person who willfully resists or obstructs any official or agent appointed by the director of environmental management while lawfully engaged in the execution of the purposes of §§

2-17-9

—

2-17-16

or who violates the provisions of §

2-17-14

, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each offense.

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-15

.

2-17-16.
Prosecution of violations.

All prosecutions under the provisions of §§

2-17-9

—

2-17-16

shall be instituted by the director of environmental management, and shall be directed by him or her, and all penalties recovered for the violation of any of the provisions of §§

2-17-9

—

2-17-16

shall be paid into the treasury of the state.

History of Section. P.L. 1917, ch. 1540, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 286, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 229, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-16

.